Washington statutes.
RCW 18.100.130

Application of Business Corporation Act and Nonprofit Corporation Act.

(1) For a professional service corporation organized for pecuniary profit under this chapter, the provisions of Title 23B RCW shall be applicable except to the extent that any of the provisions of this chapter are interpreted to be in conflict with the provisions thereof, and in such event the provisions and sections of this chapter shall take precedence with respect to a corporation organized pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(2) For a professional service corporation organized under this chapter and chapter 24.03A RCW as a nonprofit corporation, the provisions of chapter 24.03A RCW shall be applicable except to the extent that any of the provisions of this chapter are interpreted to be in conflict with the provisions thereof, and in such event the provisions and sections of this chapter shall take precedence with respect to a corporation organized under the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2021 c 176 s 5205; 1991 c 72 s 5; 1986 c 261 s 2; 1983 c 51 s 6; 1969 c 122 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 176: See note following RCW 24.03A.005.